src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The LIVONIAN language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON V_
!! CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING
+V+TYÄ: # ;

LEXICON TV_
!! CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING
+V+TV: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ
!! 1 lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ
+V+Aux: K ;

LEXICON IV_LǞʼDÕ
!! 1 lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ
+V+IV: K ;

LEXICON TV_TǬʼDÕ
!! 2 tǭʼdõ:tǭʼ
+V+TV: V-01_TǬʼDÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_VĪDÕ
!! 3 vīdõ:vī
+V+Aux: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VĪDÕ
!! 3 vīdõ:vī
+V+IV: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VĪDÕ
!! 3 vīdõ:vī
+V+TV: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_NǞʼDÕ
!! 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
+V+IV: V-01_NǞʼDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_NǞʼDÕ
!! 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
!! * Yaml: __naeaeqdw__
+V+TV: V-01_NǞʼDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KǞʼDÕ
!! 5 kǟʼdõ:kǟʼ
+V+IV: K ;

LEXICON TV_TĪʼEDÕ
!! 6 tīʼedõ:tīʼe
+V+TV: K ;


LEXICON V-AUX_SĪEDÕ
!! 7 sīedõ:sīe
+V+Aux: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_SĪEDÕ
!! 7 sīedõ:sīe
+V+IV: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SĪEDÕ
!! 7 sīedõ:sīe
+V+TV: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_SǬDÕ
!! 8 sǭdõ:s
+V+IV: V-01_SǬDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SǬDÕ
!! 8 sǭdõ:s
+V+TV: V-01_SǬDÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_SǬDÕ
!! 8 sǭdõ:s
+V+Aux: V-01_SǬDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_JŪODÕ
!! 9 jūodõ:jūo
+V+IV: V-01_JŪODÕ ;

LEXICON TV_JŪODÕ
!! 9 jūodõ:jūo
+V+TV: V-01_JŪODÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_VȰLDA
!! 10 vȱlda:
+V+Aux: K ;

LEXICON IV_VȰLDA
!! 10 vȱlda:
+V+IV: K ;

LEXICON IV_TŪLDA
!! 11 tūlda:
+V+IV: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_PĀNDA
!! 12 pānda:
+V+Aux: K ;

LEXICON IV_PĀNDA
!! 12 pānda:
+V+IV: K ;

LEXICON TV_PĀNDA
!! 12 pānda:
+V+TV: K ;

LEXICON IV_JEʼLLÕ
!! 13 jeʼllõ:jeʼlā
+V+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_JEʼLLÕ
!! 13 jeʼllõ:jeʼllõ
+V+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ASTÕ
!! 18 astõ:astõ
+V+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ASTÕ
!! 18 astõ:astõ
+V+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VÕTTÕ
!! 19 võttõ:võttõ
+V+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VIEʼDDÕ
!! 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼddõ
+V+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VIEʼDDÕ
!! 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼddõ
+V+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MAKSÕ
!! 25 maksõ:maksõ
+V+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MAKSÕ
!! 25 maksõ:maksõ
+V+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TAPPÕ
!! 26 tappõ:tappõ
+V+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MÄNGÕ
!! 14 mängõ:mǟnga
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KILLÕ
!! 15 killõ:kīla
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PALLÕ
!! 16 pallõ:pǭla
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LOULÕ
!! 17 loulõ:lōla
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_LAITÕ
!! 20 laittõ:lāita
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LAITÕ
!! 20 laittõ:lāita
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TÄUTÕ
!! 21 täutõ:tǟta
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TÄUTÕ
!! 21 täutõ:tǟta
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_PȮĻTÕ
!! 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PȮĻTÕ
!! 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MȮISTÕ
!! 23 mȯistõ:mūošta
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MȮISTÕ
!! 23 mȯistõ:mūošta
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ANDÕ
!! 27 andõ:ānda
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ANDÕ
!! 27 andõ:ānda
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TIEUDÕ
!! 28 tieudõ:tīeda
+V+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TIEUDÕ
!! 28 tieudõ:tīeda
+V+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

!! 29-48 follow same pattern
LEXICON IV_LUʼGGÕ
!! luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LUʼGGÕ
!! luʼggõ:lugū 29
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MUʼDŽÕ
!! muʼdžõ:mudžū 30
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MUʼDŽÕ
!! muʼdžõ:mudžū 30
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VAKȚÕ
!! vakțõ:vakțū 31
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ      ;

LEXICON TV_VAKȚÕ
!! vakțõ:vakțū 31
+V+TV:	V-01_LUʼGGÕ	;

LEXICON IV_KITTÕ
!! kittõ:kitū 32
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KITTÕ
!! kittõ:kitū 32
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ
!! riʼddõ:ridū 33
+V+Aux:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_RIʼDDÕ
!! riʼddõ:ridū 33
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_RIʼDDÕ
!! riʼddõ:ridū 33
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KUTSÕ
!! kutsõ:kutsū 34
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KUTSÕ
!! kutsõ:kutsū 34
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_LASKÕ
!! laskõ:laskū 35
+V+Aux:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_LASKÕ
!! laskõ:laskū 35
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LASKÕ
!! laskõ:laskū 35
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AKKÕ
!! akkõ:akū 36
!! Should ss be s and šš be š? 2013-02-19
+V+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AKKÕ
!! akkõ:akū 36
+V+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;


LEXICON V-AUX_AIGÕ
!! aigõ:āigõ 37
+V+Aux:	V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AIGÕ
!! aigõ:āigõ 37
+V+IV:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AIGÕ
!! aigõ:āigõ 37
+V+TV:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KUOŖŖÕ
!! kuoŗŗõ:kūoŗõ 38
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_VANNÕ
!! vannõ:vǭnõ 39
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;


LEXICON IV_PȮĻĻÕ
!! pȯļļõ:pūoļõ 40
+V+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;


LEXICON IV_PȮIMÕ
!! pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
+V+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_PȮIMÕ
!! pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_OUŖÕ
!! ouŗõ:ōŗõ 42
+V+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_KEIJÕ
!! keijõ:kējõ 43
+V+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_KEIJÕ
!! keijõ:kējõ 43
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;


LEXICON IV_AŖŠTÕ
!! aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
+V+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_AŖŠTÕ
!! aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
+V+TV:	V-01_AIGÕ	;

LEXICON TV_PȮRTÕ
!! pȯrtõ:pūortõ 45
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_OUTÕ
!! outõ:ōtõ 46
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON V-AUX_TUNDÕ
!! tundõ:tūndõ 47
+V+Aux:    V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_TUNDÕ
!! tundõ:tūndõ 47
+V+IV:	V-01_AIGÕ	;

LEXICON TV_TUNDÕ
!! tundõ:tūndõ 47
+V+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_OUDÕ
!! oudõ:ōdõ 48
+V+TV:	V-01_AIGÕ	;


LEXICON IV_KŪLÕ
!! kūlõ:kūlõ 49
+V+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KŪLÕ
!! kūlõ:kūlõ 49
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ARRÕ
!! arrõ:arrõ 50
+V+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ARRÕ
!! arrõ:arrõ 50
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AʼILÕ
!! aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51
+V+IV: V-01_AʼILÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AʼILÕ
!! aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51
+V+TV: V-01_AʼILÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SVAʼRRÕ
!! svaʼrrõ:svaʼrrõ 52
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_KĪTÕ
!! kītõ:kīt 53
+V+Aux: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KĪTÕ
!! kītõ:kīt 53
!! ~701
+V+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KĪTÕ
!! kītõ:kīt 53
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;


LEXICON IV_ÄʼBȚÕ
!! äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54
+V+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ÄʼBȚÕ
!! äʼbțõ:äʼbț 54
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
+V+V: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
+V+Aux: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
+V+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KŪLDÕ
!! kūldõ:kūld 55
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KĪSKÕ
!! kīskõ:kīsk 56
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ
!! īʼedõ:īed 57
+V+Aux: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ĪʼEDÕ
!! īʼedõ:īed 57
+V+IV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ĪʼEDÕ
!! īʼedõ:īed 57
+V+TV: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON V_UMBLÕ
!! umblõ:umblõ 58
+V: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_UMBLÕ
!! umblõ: 58
+V+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_UMBLÕ
!! umblõ: 58
+V+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_MÕTLÕ
!! mõtlõ: 59
+V+Aux: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MÕTLÕ
!! mõtlõ: 59
+V+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MÕTLÕ
!! mõtlõ: 59
+V+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MǞʼDLÕ
!! mǟʼdlõ: 60
+V+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MǞʼDLÕ
!! mǟʼdlõ: 60
+V+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_NAʼGRÕ
!! naʼgrõ: 60
+V+IV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_NAʼGRÕ
!! naʼgrõ: 60
+V+TV: V-01_UMBLÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ALĀ
!! 62 alā:alā
+V+Aux: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_ÄʼB
!! 62 äʼb:ä
+V+Neg: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_IʼZ
!! 62 iʼz:ä
+V+Neg: K ;

LEXICON TV_SÄ
!! 63 sä:sä
+V+TV: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_PIḐĪKS
!! 64 piḑīks:piḑī
+V+Aux: K ;

!! !!After transitive, intransitive, auxiliary and such tags have been added
!! 1

!! 2
LEXICON V-01_TǬʼDÕ
 V-01_VĪDÕ ;

!! 3
LEXICON V-01_VĪDÕ
!! This is mutual for 3: 
!! vīdõ:vī
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_ž    ;
! Cond
: COND ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_nd ;
:%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;


LEXICON V-01_NǞʼDÕ !!= @CODE@ 4
!! This is mutual for ??: 
!! 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
:d   GER_sõ   ;
   INF_dõ	  ;
:%^StodRM   SUP-STEM_mõ	  ; 
   INDPRSSG1-STEM    ;
   INDCONNEGSG    ;
!! Prt
 INDPRT_ž    ;
! Cond
: COND ;
!! Imprt
	IMPRTSG2    ;
	IMPRTPL1	;
	IMPRTPL2	;
	IMPRTCONNEG ;

!! Jus
 JUS_gõ	;
!! Qvo
 QUO-STEM_ji	;

!! participles
 ACTPRSPRC ;
 ACTPRFPRC_nd ;
:%^VowsRM PSSPRSPRC ;
:%^VowsRM	PSSPRFPRCSG    ;
!!5
