src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
eitõ:eitõ IV_TÄUTÕ  "heittäytyä" ;
gaʼḑḑõ:gaʼḑḑõ V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ  "sattua" ;
iʼzt:iʼzt V-AUX_ÄʼB  "et" ;
joudõ:joudõ IV_TIEUDÕ  "joutua" ;
kaʼzzõ:kaʼzzõ IV_JEʼLLÕ  "kasvaa" ;
keijõ:keijõ TV_KEIJÕ  "tahkoa" ;
killõ:killõ TV_KILLÕ  "kylvää" ;
kuostõ:kuostõ IV_ASTÕ  "vastata" ;
kuʼddõ:kuʼddõ IV_RIʼDDÕ  "tehdä kennoja" ;
kǟʼdõ:kǟʼ IV_KǞʼDÕ  "käydä" ;
loulõ:loulõ TV_LOULÕ  "laulaa" ;
läppõ:läppõ IV_AKKÕ  "ummehtua" ;
lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ IV_LǞʼDÕ  "mennä" ;
lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ  "täytyä" ;
maitõ:māitõ IV_AŖŠTÕ  "pilaantua" ;
maņțõ:māņțõ TV_AŖŠTÕ  "torjua" ;
meʼḑḑõ:meʼḑḑõ TV_RIʼDDÕ  "metsästää" ;
muʼdžõ:muʼdžõ IV_MUʼDŽÕ  "vilistä" ;
muʼdžõ:muʼdžõ TV_MUʼDŽÕ  "panna sekaisin" ;
mängõ:mängõ IV_MÄNGÕ  "leikkiä" ;
mõllõ:mõllõ IV_ARRÕ  "riehua" ;
mõtlõ:mõtlõ V-AUX_MÕTLÕ  "aikoa" ;
mīdõ:mī TV_VĪDÕ  "myydä" ;
mȯistõ:mȯistõ TV_MȮISTÕ  "osata" ;
nuttõ:nuttõ TV_VÕTTÕ  "nimetä" ;
nūškõ:nūškõ TV_KĪSKÕ  "haistaa" ;
nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ TV_NǞʼDÕ  "nähdä" ;
oudõ:ōdõ TV_OUDÕ  "hautoa" ;
outõ:ōtõ TV_OUTÕ  "hauduttaa" ;
pallõ:pǭla TV_PALLÕ  "pyytää" ;
paʼggõ:paʼggõ IV_LUʼGGÕ  "rakoilla" ;
peizõ:peizõ IV_KEIJÕ  "lämmetä" ;
pieksõ:pieksõ IV_MAKSÕ  "hakata" ;
pieksõ:pieksõ TV_MAKSÕ  "parkita" ;
pretsõ:pretsõ IV_KUTSÕ  "avioitua" ;
prīʼetsõ:prīʼetsõ IV_ĪʼEDÕ  "iloita" ;
puiklõ:puiklõ IV_UMBLÕ  "keksiä verukkeita" ;
puʼļļõ:puʼļļõ TV_LUʼGGÕ  "märehtiä" ;
pānda:pānda IV_PĀNDA  "heittäytyä" ;
pānda:pānda TV_PĀNDA  "panna" ;
pānda:pānda V-AUX_PĀNDA  "saada" ;
pīlatõ:pīlatõ IV_KĪTÕ  "pilvistyä" ;
pūoldõ:pūoldõ TV_  "puoltaa" ;
pūʼgõ:pūʼgõ TV_AʼILÕ  "puoskaroida" ;
pǟlõouŗõ:pǟlõ#ouŗõ IV_OUŖÕ  "karjahtaa" ;
pȯigõ:pȯigõ IV_PȮIMÕ  "poikia" ;
pȯlgõ:pȯlgõ TV_PȮIMÕ  "peruuttaa" ;
pȯrtõ:pūortõ TV_PȮRTÕ  "viekoitella" ;
pȯļļõ:pūoļõ IV_PȮĻĻÕ  "rämpiä" ;
pȯļțõ:pȯļțõ TV_PȮĻTÕ  "puida viljaa" ;
raʼdļõ:raʼdļõ IV_NAʼGRÕ  "kirvellä" ;
raʼdļõ:raʼdļõ TV_NAʼGRÕ  "hakata" ;
rištõ:rištõ IV_VAKȚÕ  "tehdä ristinmerkki" ;
rǭstõ:rǭstõ V-AUX_KĪTÕ  "olla tapana" ;
saʼddõ:saʼddõ IV_VIEʼDDÕ  "pudota" ;
seļţõ:seļţõ IV_LAITÕ  "kirkastua" ;
seļţõ:seļţõ TV_LAITÕ  "selittää" ;
sittõ:sittõ TV_KITTÕ  "paskantaa" ;
siʼddõ:siʼddõ TV_VIEʼDDÕ  "sitoa" ;
skrõuvõ:skrõuvõ TV_KŪLÕ  "ruuvata" ;
smekkõ:smekkõ TV_AKKÕ  "maistaa" ;
spitšõ:spitšõ TV_KUTSÕ  "teroittaa" ;
strempõ:strēmpõ TV_TUNDÕ  "tallata" ;
suoḑīkšõ:suoḑīkšõ IV_KŪLDÕ  "sotia" ;
svaʼrrõ:svaʼrrõ TV_SVAʼRRÕ  "punnita" ;
sõʼvlõ:sõʼvlõ IV_AʼILÕ  "syyhytä" ;
sīedõ:sīe TV_SĪEDÕ  "syödä" ;
sūʼoḑõ:sūʼoḑõ TV_ĪʼEDÕ  "rangaista" ;
sǭdõ:s IV_SǬDÕ  "päästä" ;
sǭdõ:s TV_SǬDÕ  "saada" ;
sǭdõ:s V-AUX_SǬDÕ  "voida" ;
taplõ:taplõ IV_MÕTLÕ  "tapella" ;
tappõ:tappõ TV_TAPPÕ  "tappaa" ;
tarmõ:tārmõ V-AUX_AIGÕ  "haluta" ;
taʼggõ:taʼggõ TV_JEʼLLÕ  "takoa (päähän)" ;
teļļõ:teļõ TV_KUOŖŖÕ  "teeskennellä" ;
tieudõ:tieudõ TV_TIEUDÕ  "tietää" ;
tingõ:tingõ TV_ANDÕ  "tonkia" ;
toņņõ:toņņõ TV_ARRÕ  "hajottaa" ;
tärkšlõ:tärkšlõ TV_UMBLÕ  "matkia" ;
täutõ:täutõ TV_TÄUTÕ  "täyttää" ;
tīkõ:tīkõ V-AUX_KŪLDÕ  "koettaa" ;
tīʼedslõ:tīʼedslõ TV_MǞʼDLÕ  "työstää" ;
tīʼedõ:tīʼe TV_TĪʼEDÕ  "tehdä" ;
tūldõ:tūldõ TV_KŪLDÕ  "tuultaa" ;
tūodõ:tūo TV_JŪODÕ  "tuoda" ;
tūʼoḑõ:tūʼoḑõ V-AUX_ĪʼEDÕ  "saada" ;
tǟʼntõ:tǟʼntõ IV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "osoittaa" ;
tǭʼdõ:tǭʼ TV_TǬʼDÕ  "tahtoa" ;
ulzmõtlõ:ulz#mõtlõ TV_MÕTLÕ  "sepittää" ;
ulztūlda:ulz#tuʼlā IV_TŪLDA  "ilmestyä" ;
ulzvȯstõ:ulz#vȯstõ TV_ASTÕ  "lunastaa" ;
uskõ:uskõ TV_LASKÕ  "uskoa" ;
uskõ:uskõ V-AUX_LASKÕ  "uskoa jollekulle" ;
vaŗŗõ:vǭŗõ TV_VANNÕ  "piilottaa" ;
vektõ:vektõ TV_VAKȚÕ  "vaania" ;
viettõ:viettõ IV_KITTÕ  "vettyä" ;
vilkõ:vīlkõ IV_TUNDÕ  "vilahtaa" ;
virgõ:vīrgõ IV_AIGÕ  "herätä" ;
viskõ:viskõ IV_LASKÕ  "heittäytyä" ;
võidõ:või V-AUX_VĪDÕ  "voida" ;
võrkõ:vȭrkõ V-AUX_TUNDÕ  "viitsiä" ;
vīdõ:vī TV_VĪDÕ  "viedä" ;
vǟʼgrõ:vǟʼgrõ IV_MǞʼDLÕ  "kieriskellä" ;
vȯidõ:vȯidõ IV_ANDÕ  "pysytellä" ;
vȯʼļd:vȯʼļd V-AUX_VȰLDA  "olit" ;
vȱlda:vȱlda IV_VȰLDA  "olla" ;
zingõ:zīngõ TV_AIGÕ  "laulaa iskelmiä" ;
ädāstõ:ädāstõ TV_KĪTÕ  "hermostuttaa" ;
īedõ:īe IV_SĪEDÕ  "jäädä" ;
īedõ:īe V-AUX_SĪEDÕ  "jäädä" ;
īʼtõ:īʼtõ TV_ÄʼBȚÕ  "yhdistää" ;
šūlõ:šūlõ IV_KŪLÕ  "tihkua visvaa" ;
ūdõ:ū IV_VĪDÕ  "paistua" ;
